Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.130

Intercounty rural library districts—Board of trustees.

Immediately following the establishment of an intercounty rural library district the boards of county commissioners of the counties affected shall jointly appoint a board of five or seven trustees for the district in accordance with RCW 27.12.190. The board of trustees shall appoint a librarian for the district.

[ 1959 c 133 s 1; 1947 c 75 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8246-5.]